Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3613
Department; powers and duties.

The department shall have and may exercise the following powers and duties in its administration of the Tuberculosis Detection and Prevention Act:

(1) To adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating to the care, maintenance, and treatment of patients committed under the Tuberculosis Detection and Prevention Act and other persons having communicable tuberculosis who voluntarily agree to and accept care and treatment on either an inpatient or an outpatient basis;

(2) To inspect and supervise to the extent necessary the facilities, operations, and administration of those health care facilities receiving support from the department for the purpose of providing care, treatment, or maintenance for persons infected with communicable tuberculosis;

(3) To provide visiting nursing services to those persons having communicable tuberculosis who are being treated on an outpatient basis;

(4) To adopt rules and regulations, and issue orders based thereon, relative to reports and statistics on tuberculosis from counties and the care, treatment, and maintenance of persons having tuberculosis, especially of those in the communicable or contagious stage thereof; and

(5) To set standards by rule and regulation for the types and level of medical care and treatment to be used by those health care facilities caring for tuberculous persons and to set standards by rule and regulation dealing with such matters as program standards, maximum and minimum costs and rates, administrative procedures to be followed and reports to be made, and arbitration by third parties.

Laws 1972, LB 1492, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 664;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 109;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 96;

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 36.